District of Columbia statutes.
34-505

Application of proceeds of stock.

No public utility shall apply the proceeds of any such stock, certificates of stock, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness to any other purpose or issue the same on any less favorable terms than that specified in the certificate issued by the Commission.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 990, ch. 150, § 8, par. 77

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-705.
1973 Ed., § 43-806.